District of Columbia statutes.
29-311.10

Notice of appraisal rights.

(a)

If any corporate action specified in § 29-311.02(a) is to be submitted to a vote at a shareholders’ meeting, the meeting notice shall state that the corporation has concluded that the shareholders are, are not, or may be entitled to assert appraisal rights under this subchapter. If the corporation concludes that appraisal rights are or may be available, a copy of this subchapter shall accompany the meeting notice sent to those record shareholders entitled to exercise appraisal rights.

(b)

In a merger pursuant to § 29-309.05, the parent corporation shall notify in writing all record shareholders of the subsidiary who are entitled to assert appraisal rights that the corporate action became effective. The notice shall be sent within 10 days after the corporate action became effective and include the materials described in § 29-311.12.

(c)

If any corporate action specified in § 29-311.02(a) is to be approved by written consent of the shareholders pursuant to § 29-305.04, written notice that appraisal rights are, are not, or may be available shall be:

(1)

Sent to each record shareholder from which a consent is solicited at the time consent of such shareholder is first solicited and, if the corporation has concluded that appraisal rights are or may be available, shall be accompanied by a copy of this subchapter; and

(2)

Delivered together with the notice to nonconsenting and nonvoting shareholders required by § 29-305.04(e) and (f), may include the materials described in § 29-311.12, and, if the corporation has concluded that appraisal rights are or may be available, shall be accompanied by a copy of this subchapter.

(d)

If corporate action described in § 29-311.02(a) is proposed, or a merger pursuant to § 29-309.05 is effected, the notice referred to in subsection (a) or (c) of this section, if the corporation concludes that appraisal rights are or may be available, and in subsection (b) of this section shall be accompanied by:

(1)

The annual financial statements specified in § 29-313.07(a) of the corporation that issued the shares that may be subject to appraisal, which shall be as of a date ending not more than 16 months before the date of the notice and shall comply with § 29-313.07(b); provided, that if such annual financial statements are not reasonably available, the corporation shall provide reasonably equivalent financial information; and

(2)

The latest available quarterly financial statements of such corporation, if any.

(e)

The right to receive the information described in subsection (d) of this section may be waived in writing by a shareholder before or after the corporate action.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(c)(26), 59 DCR 13171
This section is referenced in § 29-311.31.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-210 substituted “Sent” for “Given” in (c)(1).
Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.